Colorado, session 2026A, HB1309.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Colorado has led the United States in enacting family court
reforms;
(b) In recent years, a series of bills have been enacted that seek to
protect parents and children from domestic violence and child abuse when
a family court is determining custody. These bills have required training in
domestic violence and child abuse, created protections for coercive control
and its insidious permutations, and brought many survivors to the Colorado
capitol to share their stories.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(c) Despite efforts to protect victims and survivors, family courts
still award unsupervised custody, order court-ordered reunification, remove
protection orders, and dismiss the realities of various forms of abuse;
(d) In 2025, the domestic violence fatality review board reported a
record number of domestic violence fatalities. At least 7 domestic violence
fatalities directly involved domestic relations cases between the victim and
the perpetrator, 2 of which closed prior to the fatality and 5 of which were
still open. The 5 open cases involved child custody litigation, and 4 of the
5 open cases involved multiple victims, resulting in 9 homicides and one
attempted homicide.
(e) Over 62% of Colorado's child domestic violence fatality victims
were killed during child custody litigation. Of the 8 child domestic violence
fatality victims in 2024, 5 children were involved in their parents' custody
disputes.
(f) Studies suggest that one parent using repeated court actions
against the other parent is a pervasive, multifaceted, and effective tactic to
further coercive control. Parents who are abusive may misuse the legal
system by repeatedly bringing groundless motions for modification and
enforcement, and even false reports of child abuse.
(g) Seventy-three percent of domestic relations litigants appear in
family court without a lawyer;
(h) Seventy-two percent of all murder-suicides involve an intimate
partner, and 94% of the murder victims in murder-suicides are female;
(i) Lethality often escalates following separation;
(j) Parents who are abused face an increased risk of serious and
lethal violence when separating from the parent who is abusive;
(k) As of 2018, all states and the District of Columbia required
domestic violence to be considered in the best interests of the child analysis,
with 26 states and D.C. giving domestic violence extra weight.
Twenty-eight states and D.C. provide a statutory presumption against
awarding custody to a perpetrator of domestic violence.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

(l) An extensive body of research suggests that exposure to domestic
violence places children at risk of adverse developmental, behavioral,
physical, and mental health consequences, including depression, anxiety,
poor coping mechanisms, suicidal ideations, self-harm, substance abuse,
and chronic pain;
(m) The National Council of Juvenile and Family Court Judges has
drafted a model code on domestic and family violence. That model code
provides courts with clear guidance and standards to address domestic
violence in determinations concerning the allocation of parental
responsibilities to ensure consistent application and protection of victims
and children.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that:
(a) In order to protect parents and children from domestic violence,
Colorado must prioritize safety during family court proceedings;
(b) Safety must be prioritized before contact;
(c) Courts need clear guidance and standards to address domestic
violence in determinations concerning the allocation of parental
responsibilities to ensure consistent application and protection of victims
and children; and
(d) It is necessary to presume that, if a parent has committed
domestic violence, it is not in the best interests of the child to allocate
parental responsibilities to that parent. This presumption is necessary to
allow courts the ability to consider individual circumstances while
maintaining a strong and protective stance against allocating parental
responsibilities to an abusive parent.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 14-10-103, amend
(1.5)(a) and (1.5)(b); and add (1.5)(c.4) and (1.5)(c.6) as follows:
14-10-103. Definitions and interpretations of terms.
(1.5) As used in this article 10, unless the context otherwise
requires:
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

(a) "Coercive control" has the same meaning as set forth in section
14-10-124 (1.3) MEANS A PATTERN OF THREATENING, HUMILIATING, OR
INTIMIDATING ACTIONS, INCLUDING ASSAULTS OR OTHER ABUSE, THAT IS
USED TO HARM, PUNISH, OR FRIGHTEN AN INDIVIDUAL. "COERCIVE CONTROL"
INCLUDES A PATTERN OF BEHAVIOR THAT TAKES AWAY THE INDIVIDUAL'S
LIBERTY OR FREEDOM AND STRIPS AWAY THE INDIVIDUAL'S SENSE OF SELF,
INCLUDING THE INDIVIDUAL'S BODILY INTEGRITY AND HUMAN RIGHTS.
"COERCIVE CONTROL" INCLUDES ISOLATING THE INDIVIDUAL FROM SUPPORT,
EXPLOITING THE INDIVIDUAL, DEPRIVING THE INDIVIDUAL OF INDEPENDENCE,
AND REGULATING THE INDIVIDUAL'S EVERYDAY BEHAVIOR. "COERCIVE
CONTROL" INCLUDES, BUT IS NOT LIMITED TO, ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) ISOLATING THE INDIVIDUAL FROM FRIENDS AND FAMILY;
(II) MONITORING, SURVEILLING, REGULATING, OR CONTROLLING THE
INDIVIDUAL'S, OR THE INDIVIDUAL'S CHILD'S OR RELATIVE'S, FINANCES,
ECONOMIC RESOURCES, OR ACCESS TO SERVICES;
(III) MONITORING, SURVEILLING, REGULATING, OR CONTROLLING
THE INDIVIDUAL'S, OR THE INDIVIDUAL'S CHILD'S OR RELATIVE'S, ACTIVITIES,
COMMUNICATIONS, OR MOVEMENTS, INCLUDING THROUGH TECHNOLOGY;
(IV) NAME-CALLING, DEGRADING, OR DEMEANING THE INDIVIDUAL,
OR THE INDIVIDUAL'S CHILD OR RELATIVE, ON A FREQUENT BASIS;
(V) THREATENING TO HARM OR KILL THE INDIVIDUAL, OR THE
INDIVIDUAL'S CHILD OR RELATIVE, INCLUDING WEARING, ACCESSING,
DISPLAYING, USING, OR CLEANING A WEAPON IN AN INTIMIDATING OR
THREATENING MANNER;
(VI) THREATENING TO COMMIT SUICIDE OR OTHERWISE HARM ONE'S
OWN PERSON WHEN USED AS A METHOD OF COERCION, CONTROL,
PUNISHMENT, INTIMIDATION, OR RETALIATION AGAINST THE PERSON;
(VII) THREATENING TO HARM OR KILL AN ANIMAL WITH WHICH THE
INDIVIDUAL, OR THE INDIVIDUAL'S CHILD OR RELATIVE, HAS AN EMOTIONAL
BOND;
(VIII) THREATENING TO PUBLISH THE INDIVIDUAL'S, OR THE
INDIVIDUAL'S CHILD'S OR RELATIVE'S, SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION,
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

INCLUDING SEXUALLY EXPLICIT MATERIAL, OR MAKE REPORTS TO THE POLICE
OR AUTHORITIES;
(IX) DAMAGING THE INDIVIDUAL'S, OR THE INDIVIDUAL'S CHILD'S OR
RELATIVE'S, PROPERTY OR HOUSEHOLD GOODS;
(X) THREATENING THE INDIVIDUAL, OR THE INDIVIDUAL'S CHILD OR
RELATIVE, WITH DEPORTATION OR CONTACTING AUTHORITIES BASED ON
PERCEIVED OR ACTUAL IMMIGRATION STATUS, WITHHOLDING ESSENTIAL
DOCUMENTS REQUIRED FOR IMMIGRATION, OR THREATENING TO WITHDRAW
OR INTERFERE WITH AN ACTIVE IMMIGRATION APPLICATION OR PROCESS; OR
(XI) FORCING THE INDIVIDUAL, OR THE INDIVIDUAL'S CHILD OR
RELATIVE, TO TAKE PART IN CRIMINAL ACTIVITIES OR CHILD ABUSE.
(b) (I) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as set forth in
section 14-10-124 (1.3) MEANS ONE OF THE FOLLOWING COMMITTED BY A
PARTY, WHETHER OR NOT THE CONDUCT CONSTITUTES A CRIMINAL OFFENSE:
(A) AN ACT OR THREATENED ACT OF PHYSICAL ASSAULT OR BODILY
HARM AGAINST THE OTHER PARENT OR A FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD MEMBER,
INCLUDING A CHILD;
(B) AN ACT OR THREATENED ACT OF DAMAGE TO PROPERTY
BELONGING TO THE OTHER PARENT OR A FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD MEMBER,
INCLUDING A CHILD;
(C) AN ACT OR THREATENED ACT OF PHYSICAL ASSAULT OR BODILY
HARM AGAINST AN ANIMAL BELONGING TO THE OTHER PARENT OR A FAMILY
OR HOUSEHOLD MEMBER, INCLUDING A CHILD;
(D) STALKING;
(E) SEXUAL ASSAULT;
(F) COERCIVE CONTROL;
(G) ECONOMIC ABUSE; OR
(H) HUMAN TRAFFICKING.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

(II) "DOMESTIC VIOLENCE" DOES NOT MEAN BEHAVIORS THAT ARE
USED BY A PARENT TO PROTECT THEMSELF; A FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD
MEMBER, INCLUDING A CHILD; OR PROPERTY, INCLUDING AN ANIMAL, FROM
THE HARM OR RISK OF HARM PRESENTED BY THE OTHER PARENT.
(c.4) "INTIMATE RELATIONSHIP" MEANS A RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN
SPOUSES, FORMER SPOUSES, PAST OR PRESENT UNMARRIED COUPLES, OR
PERSONS WHO ARE BOTH PARENTS OF THE SAME CHILD, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE PERSONS HAVE BEEN MARRIED OR HAVE LIVED TOGETHER AT
ANY TIME.
(c.6) "SEXUAL ASSAULT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
19-1-103.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 14-10-124, amend
(1.5)(a) introductory portion, (1.5)(a)(III.5), and (1.5)(b) introductory
portion; repeal (1.3) and (4); and add (1.5)(c) and (1.6) as follows:
14-10-124. Best interests of the child.
(1.3) Definitions. For purposes of this section and section
14-10-129 (2)(c), unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Coercive control" means a pattern of threatening, humiliating,
or intimidating actions, including assaults or other abuse, that is used to
harm, punish, or frighten an individual. "Coercive control" includes a
pattern of behavior that takes away the individual's liberty or freedom and
strips away the individual's sense of self, including the individual's bodily
integrity and human rights. "Coercive control" includes isolating the
individual from support, exploiting the individual, depriving the individual
of independence, and regulating the individual's everyday behavior.
"Coercive control" includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:
(I) Isolating the individual from friends and family;
(II) Monitoring, surveilling, regulating, or controlling the
individual's, or the individual's child's or relative's, finances, economic
resources, or access to services;
(III) Monitoring, surveilling, regulating, or controlling the
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

individual's, or the individual's child's or relative's, activities,
communications, or movements, including through technology;
(IV) Name-calling, degrading, or demeaning the individual, or the
individual's child or relative, on a frequent basis;
(V) Threatening to harm or kill the individual or the individual's
child or relative, including wearing, accessing, displaying, using, or
cleaning a weapon in an intimidating or threatening manner;
(VI) Threatening to commit suicide or otherwise harm one's own
person, when used as a method of coercion, control, punishment,
intimidation, or retaliation against the person;
(VII) Threatening to harm or kill an animal with which the
individual or the individual's child or relative has an emotional bond;
(VIII) Threatening to publish the individual's, or the individual's
child's or relative's, sensitive personal information, including sexually
explicit material, or make reports to the police or authorities;
(IX) Damaging the individual's, or the individual's child's or
relative's, property or household goods;
(X) Threatening the individual, or the individual's child or relative,
with deportation or contacting authorities based on perceived or actual
immigration status, withholding essential documents required for
immigration, or threatening to withdraw or interfere with an active
immigration application or process; or
(XI) Forcing the individual, or the individual's child or relative, to
take part in criminal activities or child abuse.
(b) "Domestic violence" means an act of violence or a threatened act
of violence upon a person with whom the actor is or has been involved in
an intimate relationship, and may include any act or threatened act against
a person or against property, including an animal, when used as a method
of coercion, control, punishment, intimidation, or revenge directed against
a person with whom the actor is or has been involved in an intimate
relationship.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

(c) "Intimate relationship" means a relationship between spouses,
former spouses, past or present unmarried couples, or persons who are both
parents of the same child regardless of whether the persons have been
married or have lived together at any time.
(d) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as set forth in section
19-1-103.
(1.5) Allocation of parental responsibilities. The court shall
determine the allocation of parental responsibilities, including parenting
time and decision-making responsibilities, in accordance with the best
interests of the child, giving paramount consideration to the child's safety
and the physical, mental, and emotional conditions and needs of the child
as follows:
(a) Determination of parenting time. The court, upon the motion
of either party or upon its own motion, may make provisions for parenting
time that the court finds are in the best interests of the child, with the child's
safety always paramount, unless the court finds, after a hearing, that
parenting time by the party would endanger the child's physical health or
significantly impair the child's emotional development. In addition to a
finding that parenting time would endanger the child's physical health or
significantly impair the child's emotional development, in any order
imposing or continuing a parenting time restriction, the court shall
enumerate the specific factual MAKE findings supporting IMPOSING the
restriction, including findings related to domestic violence, child abuse OR
NEGLECT, SEXUAL ASSAULT THAT RESULTED IN THE CONCEPTION OF A CHILD,
and OR child sexual abuse, and may enumerate the conditions that the
restricted party could fulfill in order to seek modification in the parenting
plan. When a claim of child abuse or neglect, domestic violence, or sexual
assault where there is also a claim that the child was conceived as a result
of the sexual assault has been made to the court, or the court has reason to
believe that a party has committed child abuse or neglect, domestic
violence, or sexual assault where there is also a claim that the child was
conceived as a result of the sexual assault, prior to determining parenting
time, the court shall follow the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.
In determining the best interests of the child for purposes of parenting time,
the court shall consider all relevant factors, including:
(III.5) Any report related to domestic violence that is submitted to
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

the court by a child and family investigator, if one is appointed pursuant to
section 14-10-116.5; a professional parental responsibilities evaluator, if
one is appointed pursuant to section 14-10-127; or a legal representative of
the child, if one is appointed pursuant to section 14-10-116. The court may
consider other testimony regarding domestic violence from the parties,
experts, therapists for any parent or child, the department of human
services, parenting time supervisors, school personnel, or other lay
witnesses. FOR ANY EVIDENCE SUBMITTED TO THE COURT BY A PARTY, A
CHILD AND FAMILY INVESTIGATOR APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SECTION
14-10-116.5, A PARENTAL RESPONSIBILITIES EVALUATOR APPOINTED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 14-10-127, OR A LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF THE
CHILD APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 14-10-116 THAT A PARTY HAS
COMMITTED DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT, OR SEXUAL
ASSAULT THAT RESULTED IN THE CONCEPTION OF A CHILD, THE COURT MAY
CONSIDER ANY RELEVANT AND ADMISSIBLE EVIDENCE, INCLUDING
TESTIMONY FROM THE PARTIES, EXPERTS, THERAPISTS FOR ANY PARENT OR
CHILD, THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, PARENTING TIME
SUPERVISORS, SCHOOL PERSONNEL, OR OTHER LAY WITNESSES. THE COURT
SHALL MAKE FINDINGS ON THE RECORD BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE
EVIDENCE WHETHER A PARTY HAS COMMITTED DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, CHILD
ABUSE OR NEGLECT, OR SEXUAL ASSAULT THAT RESULTED IN THE
CONCEPTION OF A CHILD.
(b) Allocation of decision-making responsibility. The court, upon
the motion of either party or its own motion, shall allocate the
decision-making responsibilities between the parties based upon the best
interests of the child. In determining decision-making responsibility, the
court may allocate the decision-making responsibility with respect to each
issue affecting the child mutually between both parties or individually to
one or the other party or any combination thereof. When a claim of child
abuse or neglect or domestic violence has been made to the court, or the
court has reason to believe that a party has committed child abuse or
neglect, domestic violence, or sexual assault where there is also a claim that
the child in question was conceived as a result of the sexual assault, prior
to allocating decision-making responsibility, the court shall follow the
provisions of subsection (4) of this section. In determining the best interests
of the child for purposes of allocating decision-making responsibilities, the
court shall consider, in addition to the factors set forth in paragraph (a) of
this subsection (1.5) SUBSECTION (1.5) OF THIS SECTION, all relevant factors,
including:
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

(c) (I) IF A COURT DETERMINES BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE
EVIDENCE THAT A PARTY HAS COMMITTED DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, CHILD
ABUSE OR NEGLECT, OR SEXUAL ASSAULT THAT RESULTED IN THE
CONCEPTION OF A CHILD, IT IS NOT IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD TO
ALLOCATE MUTUAL DECISION-MAKING RESPONSIBILITY OVER THE OBJECTION
OF THE OTHER PARTY OR THE LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF THE CHILD UNLESS
THE COURT MAKES SPECIFIC FINDINGS THAT MUTUAL DECISION-MAKING CAN
OCCUR WITHOUT COERCION, INTIMIDATION, RETALIATION, OR RISK OF HARM
TO THE ABUSED PARTY OR THE CHILD; AND
(II) THE COURT SHALL NOT APPOINT A PARENTING COORDINATOR
SOLELY TO ENSURE THAT MUTUAL DECISION-MAKING CAN BE
ACCOMPLISHED.
(1.6) (a) IF A COURT DETERMINES BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE
EVIDENCE THAT A PARTY HAS COMMITTED DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, CHILD
ABUSE OR NEGLECT, OR SEXUAL ASSAULT THAT RESULTED IN THE
CONCEPTION OF A CHILD, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER AS THE PRIMARY
CONCERN THE SAFETY AND WELL-BEING OF THE CHILD AND THE ABUSED
PARTY. THE COURT SHALL IMPOSE CONDITIONS ON PARENTING TIME THAT
ENSURE THE SAFETY OF THE CHILD AND ABUSED PARTY, GIVING PARAMOUNT
CONSIDERATION TO THE SAFETY AND NEEDS OF THE CHILD AND ABUSED
PARTY. THE PARENTING PLAN FOR A CASE DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(1.6) MAY INCLUDE, BUT IS NOT LIMITED TO, THE FOLLOWING:
(I) AN ORDER LIMITING CONTACT BETWEEN THE PARTIES TO
CONTACT THAT THE COURT DEEMS IS SAFE AND THAT MINIMIZES
UNNECESSARY COMMUNICATION BETWEEN THE PARTIES;
(II) AN ORDER THAT REQUIRES THE EXCHANGE OF THE CHILD FOR
PARENTING TIME TO OCCUR IN A PROTECTED SETTING DETERMINED BY THE
COURT;
(III) AN ORDER FOR SUPERVISED PARENTING TIME;
(IV) AN ORDER RESTRICTING OVERNIGHT PARENTING TIME;
(V) AN ORDER THAT RESTRICTS THE PARTY WHO HAS COMMITTED
DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT, OR SEXUAL ASSAULT THAT
RESULTED IN THE CONCEPTION OF A CHILD FROM POSSESSING OR CONSUMING
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

ALCOHOL, INTOXICATING SUBSTANCES, OR CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES
DURING PARENTING TIME OR FOR TWENTY-FOUR HOURS PRIOR TO THE
COMMENCEMENT OF PARENTING TIME;
(VI) AN ORDER DIRECTING THAT THE ADDRESS OF THE CHILD OR OF
ANY PARTY REMAIN CONFIDENTIAL;
(VII) AN ORDER THAT IMPOSES ANY OTHER CONDITION ON ONE OR
MORE PARTIES THAT THE COURT DETERMINES IS NECESSARY TO PROTECT THE
SAFETY OF THE CHILD, ANOTHER PARTY, OR ANY OTHER FAMILY OR
HOUSEHOLD MEMBER OF A PARTY; AND
(VIII) AN ORDER THAT REQUIRES CHILD SUPPORT PAYMENTS TO BE
MADE THROUGH THE CHILD SUPPORT REGISTRY TO AVOID THE NEED FOR ANY
RELATED CONTACT BETWEEN THE PARTIES AND AN ORDER THAT THE
PAYMENTS BE TREATED AS A NONDISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION CASE.
(b) WHEN THE COURT FINDS BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE
THAT ONE OF THE PARTIES HAS COMMITTED DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, CHILD
ABUSE OR NEGLECT, OR SEXUAL ASSAULT THAT RESULTED IN THE
CONCEPTION OF A CHILD, THE COURT MAY ORDER THE PARTY TO SUBMIT TO
A DOMESTIC VIOLENCE EVALUATION AND ANY RECOMMENDED TREATMENT,
AT THE SOLE EXPENSE OF THE PARTY. IF THE COURT DETERMINES, BASED
UPON THE RESULTS OF THE EVALUATION, THAT TREATMENT IS APPROPRIATE,
THE COURT MAY ORDER THE PARTY TO PARTICIPATE IN DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
TREATMENT. AT ANY TIME, THE COURT MAY REQUIRE A SUBSEQUENT
EVALUATION TO DETERMINE WHETHER ADDITIONAL TREATMENT IS
NECESSARY. IF THE COURT AWARDS PARENTING TIME TO A PARTY WHO HAS
BEEN ORDERED TO PARTICIPATE IN DOMESTIC VIOLENCE TREATMENT, THE
COURT MAY ORDER THE PARTY TO OBTAIN A REPORT FROM THE TREATMENT
PROVIDER CONCERNING THE PARTY'S PROGRESS IN TREATMENT AND
ADDRESSING ANY ONGOING SAFETY CONCERNS REGARDING THE PARTY'S
PARENTING TIME.
(c) IF THE COURT FINDS BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE
THAT A PARTY HAS COMMITTED DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT, OR SEXUAL ASSAULT THAT RESULTED IN THE CONCEPTION OF A
CHILD, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER WHETHER IT IS IN THE BEST INTERESTS
OF THE CHILD TO PROHIBIT OR RESTRICT THE PARENTING TIME OF THAT
PARTY WITH THE CHILD.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

(d) IF A PARTY IS ABSENT OR LEAVES HOME BECAUSE OF DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE, CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT, OR SEXUAL ASSAULT THAT RESULTED
IN THE CONCEPTION OF A CHILD COMMITTED BY THE OTHER PARTY, THE
ABSENCE OR LEAVING IS NOT A FACTOR IN DETERMINING THE BEST
INTERESTS OF THE CHILD.
(4) (a) When a claim of child abuse or neglect, domestic violence,
or sexual assault where there is also a claim that the child was conceived as
a result of the sexual assault has been made to the court, or the court has
reason to believe that a party has committed child abuse or neglect,
domestic violence, or sexual assault that resulted in the conception of the
child, prior to allocating parental responsibilities, including parenting time
and decision-making responsibility, and prior to considering the factors set
forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1.5) of this section, the court
shall consider the following factors:
(I) Whether one of the parties has committed an act of child abuse
or neglect as defined in section 18-6-401, C.R.S., or as defined under the
law of any state, which factor must be supported by a preponderance of the
evidence. If the court finds that one of the parties has committed child abuse
or neglect, then it shall not be in the best interests of the child to allocate
mutual decision-making with respect to any issue over the objection of the
other party or the legal representative of the child.
(II) Whether one of the parties has committed an act of domestic
violence, has engaged in a pattern of domestic violence, or has a history of
domestic violence, which factor must be supported by a preponderance of
the evidence. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that one
of the parties has committed domestic violence:
(A) It shall not be in the best interests of the child to allocate mutual
decision-making responsibility over the objection of the other party or the
legal representative of the child, unless the court finds that there is credible
evidence of the ability of the parties to make decisions cooperatively in the
best interest of the child in a manner that is safe for the abused party and the
child; and
(B) The court shall not appoint a parenting coordinator solely to
ensure that mutual decision-making can be accomplished.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

(III) Whether one of the parties has committed an act of sexual
assault resulting in the conception of the child, which factor must be
supported by a preponderance of the evidence. If the court finds by a
preponderance of the evidence that one of the parties has committed sexual
assault and the child was conceived as a result of the sexual assault, there
is a rebuttable presumption that it is not in the best interests of the child to
allocate sole or split decision-making authority to the party found to have
committed sexual assault or to allocate mutual decision-making between a
party found to have committed sexual assault and the party who was
sexually assaulted with respect to any issue.
(IV) If one of the parties is found by a preponderance of the
evidence to have committed sexual assault resulting in the conception of the
child, whether it is in the best interests of the child to prohibit or limit the
parenting time of that party with the child.
(b) The court shall consider the additional factors set forth in
paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1.5) of this section in light of any
finding of child abuse or neglect, domestic violence, or sexual assault
resulting in the conception of a child pursuant to this subsection (4).
(c) If a party is absent or leaves home because of an act or
threatened act of domestic violence committed by the other party, such
absence or leaving shall not be a factor in determining the best interests of
the child.
(d) When the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that
one of the parties has committed child abuse or neglect, domestic violence,
or sexual assault resulting in the conception of the child, the court shall
consider, as the primary concern, the safety and well-being of the child and
the abused party.
(e) When the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that
one of the parties has committed child abuse or neglect, domestic violence,
or sexual assault resulting in the conception of the child, in formulating or
approving a parenting plan, the court shall consider conditions on parenting
time that ensure the safety of the child and abused party, giving paramount
consideration to the safety and the physical, mental, and emotional
conditions and needs of the child and abused party. In addition to any
provisions set forth in subsection (7) of this section that are appropriate, the
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

parenting plan in these cases may include, but is not limited to, the
following provisions:
(I) An order limiting contact between the parties to contact that the
court deems is safe and that minimizes unnecessary communication
between the parties;
(II) An order that requires the exchange of the child for parenting
time to occur in a protected setting determined by the court;
(III) An order for supervised parenting time;
(IV) An order restricting overnight parenting time;
(V) An order that restricts the party who has committed domestic
violence, sexual assault resulting in the conception of the child, or child
abuse or neglect from possessing or consuming alcohol or controlled
substances during parenting time or for twenty-four hours prior to the
commencement of parenting time;
(VI) An order directing that the address of the child or of any party
remain confidential;
(VII) An order that imposes any other condition on one or more
parties that the court determines is necessary to protect the child, another
party, or any other family or household member of a party; and
(VIII) An order that requires child support payments to be made
through the child support registry to avoid the need for any related contact
between the parties and an order that the payments be treated as a
nondisclosure of information case.
(f) When the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that one
of the parties has committed domestic violence, the court may order the
party to submit to a domestic violence evaluation. If the court determines,
based upon the results of the evaluation, that treatment is appropriate, the
court may order the party to participate in domestic violence treatment. At
any time, the court may require a subsequent evaluation to determine
whether additional treatment is necessary. If the court awards parenting
time to a party who has been ordered to participate in domestic violence
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

treatment, the court may order the party to obtain a report from the
treatment provider concerning the party's progress in treatment and
addressing any ongoing safety concerns regarding the party's parenting time.
The court may order the party who has committed domestic violence to pay
the costs of the domestic violence evaluations and treatment.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 14-10-127.5, amend
(3)(c) as follows:
14-10-127.5. Domestic violence training for court personnel -
expert testimony - child placement decisions - legislative declaration -
definitions.
(3) (c) If a court issues an order to remediate the resistance of a child
to have contact with an accused A party FOUND BY THE COURT TO HAVE
COMMITTED DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OR CHILD ABUSE, the order must primarily
address the behavior of the accused party, who shall accept responsibility
for the accused party's actions that negatively affected the accused party's
relationship with the child, and a mental health professional approved by the
domestic violence offender management board shall verify the accused
party's behavior before the court orders a protective party to take steps to
improve the relationship with the accused party ADDRESS THE PARTY'S
BEHAVIOR. IN ORDER FOR A COURT TO ISSUE AN ORDER PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (3)(c), THE PARTY FOUND BY THE COURT TO HAVE COMMITTED
DOMESTIC VIOLENCE OR CHILD ABUSE MUST:
(I) DEMONSTRATE GENUINE ACCOUNTABILITY FOR COMMISSION OF
DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AND ITS EFFECT ON THE OTHER PARENT OR ANOTHER
PERSON, INCLUDING A CHILD;
(II) DEMONSTRATE SUSTAINED BEHAVIORAL CHANGES THAT
ADDRESS UNDERLYING PATTERNS OF POWER AND CONTROL;
(III) COMPLY WITH THE COURT'S ORDER REGARDING TREATMENT IN
ORDER TO EXERCISE PARENTING TIME, INCLUDING PROVIDING PERIODIC
PROOF OF COMPLIANCE OF THE TREATMENT IF PROOF OF COMPLIANCE IS
ORDERED BY THE COURT. TREATMENT MUST BE WITH A MENTAL HEALTH
PROFESSIONAL WHO HAS:
(A) A MASTER'S OR DOCTORAL DEGREE AND IS LICENSED PURSUANT
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

TO ARTICLE 245 OF TITLE 12; AND
(B) SPECIALIZED TRAINING AND EXPERTISE IN TREATING SURVIVORS
AND PERPETRATORS OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AND CHILD ABUSE, AND THE
EFFECTS OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AND CHILD ABUSE ON ADULTS AND
CHILDREN; AND
(IV) A PROGRAM DOES NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBSECTION (3)(c) IF IT IS NOT IN REAL-TIME, IS SELF-DIRECTED, OR IS AN
ANGER MANAGEMENT COURSE.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 14-10-128.1, amend
(2)(b) as follows:
14-10-128.1. Appointment of parenting coordinator - disclosure.
(2) (b) In addition to making the findings required pursuant to
subsection (2)(a) of this section, prior to appointing a parenting coordinator,
the court may consider the effect of any claim FINDING or documented
evidence of domestic violence as defined in section 14-10-124, by the other
party on the parties' ability to engage in parent coordination.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 14-10-129, amend (2)
introductory portion, (2)(c) introductory portion, and (2.5)(a) introductory
portion as follows:
14-10-129. Modification of parenting time.
(2) The court shall not modify a prior order concerning parenting
time that substantially changes the parenting time, as well as changes the
party with whom the child resides a majority of the time, unless it finds,
upon the basis of facts that have arisen since the prior decree or that were
unknown to the court at the time of the prior decree, that a change has
occurred in the circumstances of the child or the party with whom the child
resides the majority of the time and that the modification is necessary to
serve the best interests of the child. In applying these standards, the court
shall retain the parenting time schedule established in the prior decree
unless:
(c) The party with whom the child resides a majority of the time is
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

intending to relocate with the child to a residence that substantially changes
the geographical ties between the child and the other party. A court hearing
on any modification of parenting time due to an intent to relocate shall be
given a priority on the court's docket. In determining whether the
modification of parenting time is in the best interests of the child, the court
shall take into account all relevant factors, including whether a party has
committed an act of domestic violence, has engaged in a pattern of domestic
violence, or has a history of domestic violence, as that term is defined in
section 14-10-124 (1.3), which factor shall MUST be supported by a
preponderance of the evidence, and shall consider such THE domestic
violence whether it occurred before or after the prior decree, and all other
factors enumerated in section 14-10-124 (1.5)(a) and:
(2.5) (a) When the court restricts a party's parenting time pursuant
to section 19-5-105.5, C.R.S., or section 19-5-105.7, C.R.S., or section
14-10-124 (4)(a)(IV) OR SECTION 14-10-124 (1.6), the court may make or
modify an order granting or denying parenting time rights whenever such
order or modification would serve the best interests of the child. Within
thirty-five days after the filing of a verified motion by the restricted party
seeking a modification of parenting time, the court shall determine from the
verified motion, and response to the motion, if any, whether there has been
a substantial and continuing change of circumstances such that the current
parenting time orders are no longer in the child's best interests, including
consideration of whether the restricted parent has satisfactorily complied
with any conditions set forth by the court when the court imposed the
restrictions on parenting time, and either:
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-13.3-503, amend (6)
as follows:
8-13.3-503. Definitions.
As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(6) "Domestic violence" means any conduct that constitutes
"domestic violence" as set forth in section 18-6-800.3 (1) or section
14-10-124 14-10-103 or "domestic abuse" as set forth in section 13-14-101
(2).
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-80-103.6, amend
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

(1) as follows:
13-80-103.6. General limitation of actions - domestic violence -
six years - definition.
(1) Notwithstanding any other statute of limitations specified in this
article 80, or any other provision of law that can be construed to reduce the
statutory period set forth in this section, any civil action to recover damages
caused by an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 14-10-124
SECTION 14-10-103, must be commenced within six years after a disability
has been removed for a person under disability, as such THE term is defined
in subsection (2) of this section, or within six years after a cause of action
accrues, whichever occurs later, and not thereafter; except that in no event
may any such civil action be commenced COMMENCE more than twenty
years after the cause of action accrues.
SECTION 9. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1309

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1309